Massachusetts, session 194th, S883.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the following new 
section after section 25A:- 
Section 25B. (a) All Medicare, Medicare Advantage, and MassHealth providers and 
suppliers must not bill Medicare beneficiaries in the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary, also known 
as QMB, eligibility group for Medicare Part A or Part B cost-sharing pursuant to federal and 
state law. 
(b) Providers who unlawfully bill Medicare beneficiaries in the QMB eligibility group for 
Medicare cost-sharing including deductibles, co-pays, or co-insurance shall be subject to 
sanctions pursuant to regulations promulgated by the division within 90 days of this section 
taking effect. Such sanctions may include but are not limited to monetary fines and shall take 
account of mitigating circumstances such as clerical errors and good faith mistakes.